Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-687
Delinquency in payment of taxes; interest; collection by Tax Commissioner.

One-half of the taxes levied as provided in section 77-684 shall become delinquent March 1, and the second half on July 1, next following the date the tax has become due and payable. All delinquent taxes shall bear interest at the rate specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature, from the date they become delinquent, and the interest shall be collected in the same manner as the tax on which the interest accrues. If such taxes and interest due thereon have not been paid on July 1 following the levy thereof, the Tax Commissioner shall collect the tax and interest by distress and sale of any property belonging to such delinquent car line company in the same manner as is required of county treasurers and county sheriffs in like cases.

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 72;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 212;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 82;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 36;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 39.